Tennessee, session 114, SB1764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-201(c)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) A violation of subdivision (b)(2)(C) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1764
010491
- 1 -